Georgia, session 2025_26, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 30 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to optometrists,
is amended by revising subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 43-30-1, relating
to definitions, as follows:
"(H)(i) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a A doctor of optometry
to may dispense and sell pharmaceutical agents, other than controlled substances, that
are related to the treatment of diseases and conditions of the eye and adnexa oculi and
are for a legitimate medical purpose to patients provided that a doctor of optometry
shall:
(I) Be on the premises when any pharmaceutical agent is dispensed to a patient and
be actively involved in the dispensing process;
S. B. 140
- 1 -

LC 52 0693
(II) Inform the patient on the appropriate use of the pharmaceutical agent being
dispensed;
(III) Document in the patient's record the name, strength, quantity, and appropriate
use of the pharmaceutical agent dispensed; and
(IV) Maintain a readily retrievable record system by manual or electronic means
of all the pharmaceutical agents purchased for administration, dispensing, or selling
in the course of the professional practice.
(ii) Nothing in this subparagraph shall expand the administrative or prescriptive
authority of a doctor of optometry."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 43-30-13, relating
to construction of chapter, as follows:
"(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to physicians and surgeons duly
licensed to practice medicine, nor; to prevent persons from selling spectacles or eyeglasses
on prescription from any duly qualified optometrist or physician, nor; to prevent any person
from selling glasses as articles of merchandise or from using test cards in connection with
the sale of such glasses at a permanently located place when not trafficking or attempting
to traffic upon assumed skill in optometry; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed
or to authorize any registered optometrist to use, dispense, sell, prescribe, or administer
drugs except as permitted by law or, to practice medicine or surgery in any manner as
defined by the laws of this state; nor shall this chapter be construed to authorize any such
person , or to use the title of 'M.D.' or any other title mentioned in Code Section 43-34-21
or 43-34-22."
S. B. 140
- 2 -

LC 52 0693
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 140
- 3 -